Tennessee, session 114, HB2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-6-3009(g), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision (2):
(2) If a student is referred to juvenile court for conduct described in subdivision
(g)(1) and is adjudicated to be unruly pursuant to title 37, chapter 1, part 1, then the
disposition may include, in addition to any other disposition authorized by law, the
suspension of the student's driving privileges or ability to obtain a driver license for a
period of up to one (1) year in accordance with title 55, chapter 10, part 7.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect on July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2146
012224
- 1 -